Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Condominiums.

§ 55.1-1907.
How condominium may be created.

No condominium shall come into existence except by the recordation of condominium instruments pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. No condominium instruments shall be recorded unless all units located or to be located on any portion of the submitted land, other than within the boundaries of any convertible lands, are depicted on plats and plans that comply with the provisions of subsections A and B of §

55.1-1920

.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.45; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1908.
Release of liens.

At the time of the conveyance to the first purchaser of a condominium unit following the recordation of the declaration, every mortgage, deed of trust, any other perfected lien, or any mechanics’ or materialmen’s liens affecting all of the condominium or a greater portion of the condominium than the condominium unit conveyed shall be paid and satisfied of record, or the declarant shall forthwith have such condominium unit released of record from all such liens not so paid and satisfied. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply, however, to any withdrawable land in a contractable condominium, nor shall any provision of this subsection be construed to prohibit the unit owners’ association from mortgaging or causing a deed of trust to be placed on any portion of the condominium within which no units are located, so long as the period of declarant control specified in §

55.1-1943

has expired and so long as the bylaws authorize such action. This subsection does not apply to any lien on more than one condominium unit in a condominium in which all units are restricted to nonresidential use and in which all unit owners whose condominium units will be subject to such lien expressly agree to assume or take subject to such lien.

If any lien, other than a deed of trust or mortgage, becomes effective against two or more condominium units subsequent to the creation of the condominium, any unit owner may remove his condominium unit from that lien by payment of the amount attributable to his condominium unit. Such amount shall be computed by reference to the liability for common expenses appertaining to that condominium unit pursuant to subsection D of §

55.1-1964

. Subsequent to such payment, discharge, or other satisfaction, the unit owner of that condominium unit shall be entitled to have that lien released as to his condominium unit in accordance with the provisions of §

55.1-341

, and the unit owners’ association shall not assess, or have a valid lien against, that condominium unit for any portion of the common expenses incurred in connection with that lien, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in §§

55.1-1964

and

55.1-1966

.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.46; 1985, c. 107; 1992, c. 72; 1993, c. 667; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Cross references.

As to lien for work done and materials furnished, see §

43-3

.

Law Review.

For comment discussing the application of the blanket lien with respect to multi-unit development in Virginia, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 637 (1979).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The case cited below was decided under prior law.

Property subject to lien. —

Subcontractors’ liens, which were directed toward an association of condominium owners, were valid despite the fact that the liens included some 40 units that were considered public property and owned by the county because the 940 unreleased unit owners did not suffer a shift in the lien burden from the 40 released units; instead, the percentage of indebtedness had already been apportioned, and it remained apportioned in the same amount. The lien was not invalidated — rather, it merely could not be enforced against the units owned by the county. Belle View Condos. v. Drytech, Inc., 65 Va. Cir. 169, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 148 (Fairfax County June 24, 2004).

§ 55.1-1909.
Description of condominium units.

After the creation of the condominium, no description of a condominium unit shall be deemed vague, uncertain, or otherwise insufficient or infirm if it sets forth the identifying number of that unit, the name of the condominium, the name of the county or city in which the condominium is situated, and either the deed book and page number where the first page of the declaration is recorded or the document number assigned to the declaration by the clerk. Any such description shall be deemed to include the undivided interest in the common elements appertaining to such unit even if such interest is not defined or referred to in the description.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.47; 1975, c. 415; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1910.
Execution of condominium instruments.

The declaration and bylaws, and any amendments to either made pursuant to §

55.1-1934

, shall be duly executed by or on behalf of all of the owners and lessees of the submitted land. The phrase “owners and lessees” in this section and in §

55.1-1926

does not include, in their capacity as such, any mortgagee, any trustee or beneficiary under a deed of trust, any other lien holder, any person having an equitable interest under any contract for the sale or lease of a condominium unit, any lessee whose leasehold interest does not extend to any portion of the common elements, any person whose land is subject to an easement included in the condominium, or, in the case of a leasehold condominium subject to any lease executed before July 1, 1962, any lessor of the submitted land who is not a declarant.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.48; 1980, c. 702; 1984, c. 21; 1990, c. 831; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1911.
Recordation of condominium instruments.

All condominium instruments and all amendments and certifications of such condominium instruments shall be recorded in every county and city in which any portion of the condominium is located. The condominium instruments, amendments, and certifications shall set forth the county or city in which the condominium is located, the name of the condominium, and either the deed book and page number where the first page of the declaration is recorded or the document number assigned to the declaration by the clerk.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.49; 1975, c. 415; 1982, c. 545; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 592.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 592 deleted the former first sentence, which read: “All amendments and certifications of condominium instruments shall set forth the name of the county or city in which the condominium is located and the deed book and page number where the first page of the declaration is recorded”; and in the final sentence, inserted “county or city in which the condominium is located, the.”

§ 55.1-1912.
Construction of condominium instruments.

Except to the extent otherwise provided by the condominium instruments:

The terms defined in §

55.1-1900

shall be deemed to have the meanings therein specified wherever they appear in the condominium instruments unless the context requires a different meaning.

To the extent that walls, floors, or ceilings are designated as the boundaries of the units or of any specified units, all lath, wallboard, plasterboard, plaster, paneling, tiles, wallpaper, paint, and finished flooring and any other materials constituting any part of the finished surfaces of such walls, floors, or ceilings are part of such units, while all other portions of such walls, floors, or ceilings are a part of the common elements.

If any chutes, flues, ducts, conduits, wires, bearing walls, bearing columns, or other apparatus lies partially within and partially outside of the designated boundaries of a unit, any portions serving only that unit are a part of that unit, while any portions serving more than one unit or any portion of the common elements are a part of the common elements.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision 3, all space, interior partitions, and other fixtures and improvements within the boundaries of a unit are a part of that unit.

Any shutters, awnings, doors, windows, window boxes, doorsteps, porches, balconies, patios, or other apparatus designed to serve a single unit, but located outside the boundaries of such unit, are limited common elements appertaining to that unit exclusively, except that if a single unit’s electrical master switch is located outside the designated boundaries of the unit, the switch and its cover are a part of the common elements.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.50; 1982, cc. 206, 545; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1913.
Complementarity of condominium instruments; controlling construction.

The condominium instruments shall be construed together and shall be deemed to incorporate one another to the extent that any requirement of this chapter as to the content of one shall be deemed satisfied if the deficiency can be cured by reference to any of the others. In the event of any conflict between the condominium instruments, the declaration shall control; but particular provisions shall control more general provisions, except that a construction consistent with the statute shall in all cases control over any inconsistent construction.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.51; 1975, c. 415; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The case cited below was decided under prior law.

Declaration controlling. —

Pursuant to § 55-79.51, the definition of commercial limited common elements and residential/commercial limited common elements as contained in the declaration was controlling. Gordon Props., LLC v. First Owners' Ass'n of Forty Six Hundred Condo., Inc., 79 Va. Cir. 683, 2009 Va. Cir. LEXIS 33 (Alexandria Apr. 3, 2009).

§ 55.1-1914.
Validity of condominium instruments; discrimination prohibited.

All provisions of the condominium instruments shall be deemed severable, and any unlawful provision of such condominium instruments shall be void.

No provision of the condominium instruments shall be deemed void by reason of the rule against perpetuities.

No restraint on alienation shall discriminate or be used to discriminate on any basis prohibited under the Virginia Fair Housing Law (§

36-96.1

et seq.).

Subject to the provisions of subsection C, the rule of property law known as the rule restricting unreasonable restraints on alienation shall not be applied to defeat any provision of the condominium instruments restraining the alienation of condominium units other than such units as may be restricted to residential use only.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.52; 1975, c. 415; 1998, cc. 32, 454; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1915.
Compliance with condominium instruments.

The declarant, every unit owner, and all those entitled to occupy a unit shall comply with all lawful provisions of this chapter and all provisions of the condominium instruments. Any lack of such compliance shall be grounds for an action to recover sums due, for damages or injunctive relief, or for any other remedy available at law or in equity, maintainable by the unit owners’ association or by its executive board or any managing agent on behalf of such association or, in any proper case, by one or more aggrieved unit owners on their own behalf or as a class action. A unit owners’ association shall have standing to sue in its own name for any claims or actions related to the common elements as provided in subsection B of §

55.1-1956

. Except as provided in subsection B, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees, costs expended in the matter, and interest on the judgment as provided in §

8.01-382

. This section does not preclude an action against the unit owners’ association and authorizes the recovery, by the prevailing party in any such action, of reasonable attorney fees, costs expended in the matter, and interest on the judgment as provided in §

8.01-382

in such actions.

In actions against a unit owner for nonpayment of assessments in which the unit owner has failed to pay assessments levied by the unit owners’ association on more than one unit or such unit owner has had legal actions taken against him for nonpayment of any prior assessment and the prevailing party is the association or its executive board or any managing agent on behalf of the association, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney fees, costs expended in the matter, and interest on the judgment as provided in subsection A, even if the proceeding is settled prior to judgment. The delinquent unit owner shall be personally responsible for reasonable attorney fees and costs expended in the matter by the unit owners’ association, whether any judicial proceedings are filed.

The condominium instruments may provide for arbitration of disputes or other means of alternative dispute resolution. Any such arbitration held in accordance with this subsection shall be consistent with the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 21 (§

8.01-577

et seq.) of Title 8.01. The place of any such arbitration or alternative dispute resolution shall be in the county or city in which the condominium is located or as mutually agreed by the parties.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.53; 1975, c. 415; 1993, c. 667; 1996, c. 977; 2012, c. 758; 2014, c. 569; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “Special Problems Related to Condominium Construction Litigation,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 405 (1985).

§ 55.1-1916.
Contents of declaration.

The declaration for every condominium shall contain the following:

The name of the condominium, which name shall include the word “condominium” or be followed by the words “a condominium.”

The name of the county or city in which the condominium is located.

A legal description by metes and bounds of the land submitted in accordance with this chapter.

A description or delineation of the boundaries of the units, including the horizontal (upper and lower) boundaries, if any, as well as the vertical (lateral or perimetric) boundaries.

A description or delineation of any limited common elements, other than those that are limited common elements by virtue of subdivision 5 of §

55.1-1912

, showing or designating the unit or units to which each is assigned.

A description or delineation of all common elements not within the boundaries of any convertible lands that may subsequently be assigned as limited common elements, together with a statement that (i) they may be so assigned and a description of the method by which any such assignments shall be made in accordance with the provisions of §

55.1-1919

or (ii) once assigned, the conditions under which they may be unassigned and converted to common elements in accordance with §

55.1-1919

.

The allocation to each unit of an undivided interest in the common elements in accordance with the provisions of §

55.1-1917

.

A statement of the extent of the declarant’s obligation to complete improvements labeled “NOT YET COMPLETED” or to begin and complete improvements labeled “NOT YET BEGUN” on plats recorded pursuant to the requirements of this chapter. Such statement shall be specific as to the type and quality of materials to be used, the size or capacity of the improvements when material, and the time by which such improvements shall be completed.

Such other matters as the declarant deems appropriate.

If the condominium contains any convertible land, the declaration shall also contain the following:

A legal description by metes and bounds of each convertible land within the condominium.

A statement of the maximum number of units that may be created within each such convertible land.

A statement, with respect to each such convertible land, of the maximum percentage of the aggregate land and floor area of all units that may be created in such convertible land that may be occupied by units not restricted exclusively to residential use. Such statement is not required if none of the units on other portions of the submitted land are restricted exclusively to residential use.

A statement of the extent to which any structure erected on any convertible land will be compatible with structures on other portions of the submitted land in terms of quality of construction, the principal materials to be used, and architectural style.

A description of all other improvements that may be made on each convertible land within the condominium.

A statement that any units created within each convertible land will be substantially identical to the units on other portions of the submitted land, or a statement describing in detail what other types of units may be created in such convertible land.

A description of the declarant’s reserved right, if any, to create limited common elements within any convertible land or to designate common elements in such convertible land that may subsequently be assigned as limited common elements, in terms of the types, sizes, and maximum number of such elements within each such convertible land.Plats and plans may be recorded as exhibits to the declaration to supplement information furnished pursuant to subdivisions 1, 4, 5, 6, and 7.

If the condominium is an expandable condominium, the declaration shall also contain the following:

The explicit reservation of an option to expand the condominium.

A statement of any limitations on that option, including a statement as to whether the consent of any unit owners shall be required, and, if so, a statement as to the method by which such consent shall be ascertained, or a statement that there are no such limitations.

A time limit, not exceeding 10 years after the recording of the declaration, upon which the option to expand the condominium shall expire, together with a statement of the circumstances, if any, that will terminate that option prior to the expiration of the time limit so specified. After the expiration of any period of declarant control reserved pursuant to subsection A of §

55.1-1943

, such time limit may be extended by an amendment to the declaration made pursuant to §

55.1-1934

.

A legal description by metes and bounds of all land that may be added to the condominium, henceforth referred to as “additional land.”

A statement as to whether, if any of the additional land is added to the condominium, all of it or any particular portion of it must be added and, if not, a statement of any limitations as to what portions may be added, or a statement that there are no such limitations.

A statement as to whether portions of the additional land may be added to the condominium at different times, together with any limitations fixing the boundaries of those portions by legal descriptions setting forth the metes and bounds of such portions or regulating the order in which they may be added to the condominium.

A statement of any limitations as to the locations of any improvements that may be made on any portions of the additional land added to the condominium, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard.

A statement of the maximum number of units that may be created on the additional land. If portions of the additional land may be added to the condominium and the boundaries of those portions are fixed in accordance with subdivision 6, the declaration shall also state the maximum number of units that may be created on each such portion added to the condominium. If portions of the additional land may be added to the condominium and the boundaries of those portions are not fixed in accordance with subdivision 6, then the declaration shall also state the maximum number of units per acre that may be created on any such portion added to the condominium.

A statement, with respect to the additional land and to any portion of such additional land that may be added to the condominium, of the maximum percentage of the aggregate land and floor area of all units that may be created on such additional land that may be occupied by units not restricted exclusively to residential use. Such statement is not required if none of the units on the submitted land are restricted exclusively to residential use.

A statement of the extent to which any structures erected on any portion of the additional land added to the condominium will be compatible with structures on the submitted land in terms of quality of construction, the principal materials to be used, and architectural style, or a statement that no assurances are made in those regards.

A description of all other improvements that will be made on any portion of the additional land added to the condominium, or a statement of any limitations as to what other improvements may be made on such additional land, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard.

A statement that any units created on any portion of the additional land added to the condominium will be substantially identical to the units on the submitted land, or a statement of any limitations as to what types of units may be created on such additional land, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard.

A description of the declarant’s reserved right, if any, to create limited common elements within any portion of the additional land added to the condominium or to designate common elements in such additional land that may subsequently be assigned as limited common elements, in terms of the types, sizes, and maximum number of such elements within each such portion, or a statement that no assurances are made in those regards.Plats and plans may be recorded as exhibits to the declaration to supplement information furnished pursuant to subdivisions 4, 5, 6, 7, 10, 11, 12, and 13.

If the condominium is a contractable condominium, the declaration shall also contain the following:

The explicit reservation of an option to contract the condominium.

A statement of any limitations on that option, including a statement as to whether the consent of any unit owners shall be required, and, if so, a statement as to the method whereby such consent shall be ascertained, or a statement that there are no such limitations.

A time limit, not exceeding 10 years after the recording of the declaration, upon which the option to contract the condominium shall expire, together with a statement of the circumstances, if any, that will terminate that option prior to the expiration of the time limit so specified.

A legal description by metes and bounds of all land that may be withdrawn from the condominium, hereinafter referred to as “withdrawable land.”

A statement as to whether portions of the withdrawable land may be withdrawn from the condominium at different times, together with any limitations fixing the boundaries of those portions by legal descriptions setting forth the metes and bounds or regulating the order in which they may be withdrawn from the condominium.

A legal description by metes and bounds of all of the submitted land to which the option to contract the condominium does not extend. This subdivision shall not be construed in derogation of any right the declarant may have to terminate the condominium in accordance with the provisions of §

55.1-1937

.Plats may be recorded as exhibits to the declaration to supplement information furnished pursuant to subdivisions 4, 5, and 6.

If the condominium is a leasehold condominium, then with respect to any ground lease or other leases the expiration or termination of which will or may terminate or contract the condominium, the declaration shall set forth the county or city in which such lease is recorded and the deed book and page number where the first page of each such lease is recorded, and the declaration shall also contain the following:

The date upon which each such lease is due to expire.

A statement as to whether any land or improvements will be owned by the unit owners in fee simple and, if so, either (i) a description of the same, including a legal description by metes and bounds of any such land, or (ii) a statement of any rights the unit owners shall have to remove such improvements within a reasonable time after the expiration or termination of the lease involved, or a statement that they shall have no such rights.

A statement of the rights the unit owners shall have to redeem any reversion, or a statement that they shall have no such rights.After the recording of the declaration, no lessor who executed such declaration, and no successor in interest to such lessor, shall have any right or power to terminate any part of the leasehold interest of any unit owner who makes timely payment of his share of the rent to the person designated in the declaration for the receipt of such rent and who otherwise complies with all covenants that, if violated, would entitle the lessor to terminate the lease. Acquisition or reacquisition of such a leasehold interest by the owner of the reversion or remainder does not cause a merger of the leasehold and fee simple interests unless all leasehold interests in the condominium are thus acquired or reacquired.

Wherever this section requires a legal description by metes and bounds of land that is submitted pursuant to this chapter or that may be added to or withdrawn from the condominium, such requirement shall be deemed satisfied by any legally sufficient description and shall be deemed to require a legally sufficient description of any easements that are submitted pursuant to this chapter or that may be added to or withdrawn from the condominium, as appropriate. In the case of each such easement, the declaration shall contain the following:

A description of the permitted use or uses.

If less than all of those entitled to the use of all of the units may utilize such easement, a statement of the relevant restrictions and limitations on utilization.

If any persons other than those entitled to the use of the units may utilize such easement, a statement of the rights of others to utilization of the easement.

Wherever this section requires a legal description by metes and bounds of land that is submitted pursuant to this chapter or that may be added to or withdrawn from the condominium, an added requirement shall be a separate legally sufficient description of all lands in which the unit owners shall or may be tenants in common or joint tenants with any other persons and a separate legally sufficient description of all lands in which the unit owners shall or may be life tenants. No units shall be situated on any such lands, however, and the declaration shall describe the nature of the unit owners’ estate in such lands. No such lands shall be shown on the same plat or plats showing other portions of the condominium but shall be shown instead on separate plats.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.54; 1975, c. 415; 1977, c. 428; 1982, c. 545; 1993, c. 667; 1998, c. 32; 2012, c. 520; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1917.
Allocation of interests in the common elements.

The declaration may allocate to each unit depicted on plats and plans that comply with subsections A and B of §

55.1-1920

an undivided interest in the common elements proportionate to either the size or par value of each unit. If par value is stated in terms of dollars, that statement shall not be deemed to reflect or control the sales price or fair market value of any unit, and no opinion, appraisal, or fair market transaction at a different figure shall affect the par value of any unit or any undivided interest in the common elements, voting rights in the unit owners’ association, or liability for common expenses assigned on the basis of such par value.

If the basis for allocation provided in subsection A is not used, then the declaration shall allocate to each such unit an equal undivided interest in the common elements, subject to the following exception: Each convertible space so depicted shall be allocated an undivided interest in the common elements proportionate to the size of each such space, vis-a-vis the aggregate size of all units so depicted, while the remaining undivided interest in the common elements shall be allocated equally to the other units so depicted.

The undivided interests in the common elements allocated in accordance with subsection A or B shall add up to 1 if stated as fractions or 100 percent if stated as percentages.

If, in accordance with subsection A or B, an equal undivided interest in the common elements is allocated to each unit, the declaration may state that fact and need not express the fraction or percentage so allocated.

Unless an equal undivided interest in the common elements is allocated to each unit, the undivided interest allocated to each unit in accordance with subsection A or B shall be reflected by a table in the declaration, or by an exhibit to the declaration, containing three columns. The first column shall identify the units, listing them serially or grouping them together in the case of units to which identical undivided interests are allocated. Corresponding figures in the second and third columns shall set forth the respective areas or par values of those units and the fraction or percentage of undivided interest in the common elements allocated to such units.

Except to the extent otherwise expressly provided by this chapter, the undivided interest in the common elements allocated to any unit shall not be altered, and any purported transfer, encumbrance, or other disposition of that interest without the unit to which it appertains is void.

The common elements shall not be subject to any action for partition until and unless the condominium is terminated.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.55; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1918.
Reallocation of interests in common elements.

If a condominium contains any convertible land or is an expandable condominium, then the declaration shall not allocate undivided interests in the common elements on the basis of par value unless the declaration:

Prohibits the creation of any units not substantially identical to the units depicted on the plats and plans recorded pursuant to subsections A and B of §

55.1-1920

; or

Prohibits the creation of any units not described pursuant to subdivision B 6 of §

55.1-1916

, in the case of convertible lands, and subdivision C 12 of §

55.1-1916

, in the case of additional land, and contains from the outset a statement of the par value that shall be assigned to every such unit that may be created.

Interests in the common elements shall not be allocated to any units to be created within any convertible land or within any additional land until plats and plans depicting the same are recorded pursuant to subsection C of §

55.1-1920

. But simultaneously with the recording of such plats and plans, the declarant shall execute and record an amendment to the declaration reallocating undivided interests in the common elements so that the units depicted on such plats and plans shall be allocated undivided interests in the common elements on the same basis as the units depicted on the plats and plans recorded simultaneously with the declaration pursuant to subsections A and B of §

55.1-1920

.

If all of a convertible space is converted into common elements, including limited common elements, then the undivided interest in the common elements appertaining to such space shall then appertain to the remaining units, being allocated among them in proportion to their undivided interests in the common elements. The principal officer of the unit owners’ association, or such other officer as the condominium instruments may specify, shall forthwith prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocation of undivided interests produced by such conversion.

In the case of a leasehold condominium, if the expiration or termination of any lease causes a contraction of the condominium that reduces the number of units, then the undivided interest in the common elements appertaining to any units withdrawn from the condominium shall then appertain to the remaining units, being allocated among them in proportion to their undivided interests in the common elements. The principal officer of the unit owners’ association, or such other officer as the condominium instruments may specify, shall forthwith prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocation of undivided interests produced by such contraction.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.56; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1919.
Assignments of limited common elements; conversion to common element.

All assignments and reassignments of limited common elements shall be reflected by the condominium instruments. No limited common element shall be assigned or reassigned except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. No amendment to any condominium instrument shall alter any rights or obligations with respect to any limited common elements without the consent of all unit owners adversely affected by such amendment as evidenced by their execution of such amendment, except to the extent that the condominium instruments expressly provided otherwise prior to the first assignment of that limited common element.

Unless expressly prohibited by the condominium instruments, a limited common element may be reassigned or converted to a common element upon written application of the unit owners concerned to the principal officer of the unit owners’ association, or to such other officer as the condominium instruments may specify. The officer to whom such application is duly made shall forthwith prepare and execute an amendment to the declaration reassigning all rights and obligations with respect to the limited common element involved. Such amendment shall be executed by the unit owners concerned and recorded by an officer of the unit owners’ association or his agent following payment by the unit owners of the units concerned of all reasonable costs for the preparation, acknowledgment, and recordation of such amendment. The amendment is effective when recorded.

A common element not previously assigned as a limited common element shall be so assigned only pursuant to subdivision A 6 of §

55.1-1916

. The amendment to the declaration making such an assignment shall be prepared and executed by the declarant, the principal officer of the unit owners’ association, or by such other officer as the condominium instruments may specify. Such amendment shall be recorded by the declarant or his agent, without charge to any unit owner, or by an officer of the unit owners’ association or his agent following payment by the unit owners of the units concerned of all reasonable costs for the preparation, acknowledgment, and recordation of such amendment. The amendment is effective when recorded, and the recordation of such amendment shall be conclusive evidence that the method prescribed pursuant to subdivision A 6 of §

55.1-1916

was adhered to. A copy of the amendment shall be delivered to the unit owners of the units concerned. If executed by the declarant, such an amendment recorded prior to July 1, 1983, shall not be invalid because it was not prepared by an officer of the unit owners’ association.

If the declarant does not prepare and record an amendment to the declaration to effect the assignment of common elements as limited common elements in accordance with rights reserved in the condominium instruments, but has reflected an intention to make such assignments in deeds conveying units, then the principal officer of the unit owners’ association may prepare, execute, and record such an amendment at any time after the declarant ceases to be a unit owner.

The declarant may unilaterally record an amendment to the declaration converting a limited common element appurtenant to a unit owned by the declarant into a common element as long as the declarant continues to own the unit.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.57; 1983, c. 230; 1991, c. 497; 1998, c. 32; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 592.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 592, in subsection B, substituted “by the unit owners concerned” for “by all of the unit owners concerned” in the penultimate sentence; and in subsection C, substituted “by the unit owners” for “by all of the unit owners” in the third sentence.